en: E160c, Paprika extract, capsanthin, capsorubin, Paprika oleoresin, oleoresin of paprika, oleoresin paprika, paprika color, colored with paprika, paprika oleoresin color, oleoresin paprika color
xx: E160c
bg: E160c, Паприка екстракт, капсантин, капсорубин
ca: E160c, Capsantina
cs: E160c, Paprikový extrakt, kapsanthin, kapsorubin, Capsanthin
da: E160c, Paprikaekstrakt (capsanthin og capsorubin), Paprikaekstrakt, Capsanthin, Capsorubin
de: E160c, Paprikaextrakt (Capsanthin und Capsorubin), Capsanthin, E 160c, Capsorubin
el: E160c, Εκχυλισμα παπρικας, καψανθινη, καψορουμπινη
es: E160c, Extracto de pimentón, capsantina, capsorrubina, Oleorresina de pimentón, Oleoresina de pimentón, Extracto de paprika, Oleoresina del pimentón, E 160c, Extracto del pimentón
et: E160c, Paprikaekstrakt, kapsantiin, kapsorubiin
fi: E160c, Paprikauute, kapsantiini, kapsorubiini, Paprikauutetta, kapsantiinia, kapsorubiinia
fr: E160c, Extrait de paprika, capsanthéine et capsorubine, Oléorésine de paprika, Capsanthine, Capsanthéine, 465-42-9, C40H56O3
hr: E160c
hu: E160c, Paprikakivonat, paprika kivonat, kapszantin, kapszorubin, Paprika-oleorezin
it: E160c, Estratto di paprica, capsantina, capsorubina
ja: E160c, パプリカ色素
lt: E160c, Paprikų ekstraktas, kapsantinas, kapsorubinas, Paprikos ekstraktas
lv: E160c, Paprikas ekstrakts, kapsantīns, kapsorubīns
mt: E160c, Estratt tal-paprika, kapsantin, kapsorubin
nb: E160c, Paprikaekstrakt, Capsantin, Capsorubin
nl: E160c, Paprika-extract, capsanthine, capsorubine
pl: E160c, Ekstrakt z papryki, kapsantyna, kapsorubina
pt: E160c, Extracto de pimentão, capsantina, capsorubina
ro: E160c, Extract de ardei roșu, capsantină, capsorubină
ru: E160c, Экстракт паприки, капсантин, капсорубин
sk: E160c, Paprikový extrakt, kapsantín, kapsorubín
sl: E160c, Izvleček paprike, kapsantin, kapsorubin
sv: E160c, Paprikaoleoresin, kapsantin, kapsorubin, Paprikaextrakt
tr: E160c, Paprika ekstraktı

en: E160c(i)
xx: E160c(i)

en: E160c(ii)
xx: E160c(ii)

en: E160d, Lycopene
xx: E160d
bg: E160d, Ликопен i, Ликопен
ca: E160d, Licopè
cs: E160d, Lykopen
da: E160d, Lycopen
de: E160d, Lycopin, Lykopin, Leukopin, Lycopen, E 160d, Lycopene
el: E160d, Λυκοπενιο
es: E160d, Licopeno i., Licopeno, E 160d
et: E160d, Lükopeen i, Lükopeen
fi: E160d, Lykopeeni, Lykopeeniä
fr: E160d, Lycopène, Lycopène extrait de Blakeslea trispora, E160d(ii), E160d(iii), E160d(i), 502-65-8
hu: E160d, Likopin
it: E160d, Licopene, C40H56, Licopina
ja: E160d, リコペン, リコピン
lt: E160d, Likopenas
lv: E160d, Likopēns
mt: E160d, Likopen i
nl: E160d, Lycopeen
pl: E160d, Likopen
pt: E160d, Licopeno
ro: E160d, Licopen
sk: E160d, Lykopén
sl: E160d, Likopen
sv: E160d, Lykopen, E 160 d, E 160d

en: E160d(i), Lycopene\, synthetic
xx: E160d(i)

en: E160d(ii), Lycopene\, tomato
xx: E160d(ii)

en: E160d(iii), Lycopene\, Blakeslea trispora
xx: E160d(iii)

en: E160e, Beta-apo-8′-carotenal (c30), Apocarotenal, Beta-apo-8'-carotenal, C.I. Food orange 6, E number 160E, Trans-beta-apo-8'-carotenal, C30H40O, apo carotenal, apocarotenal color
xx: E160e
bg: E160e, Бета-апо-8′-каротенал (c30)
cs: E160e, Β-apo-8′-karotenal (c 30)
da: E160e, Beta-apo-8′-carotenal(c30)
de: E160e, Beta-apo-8′-Carotinal (C30), Beta-apo-8′-carotinal (C30), 8′-Apo-β-caroten-8′-al, E 160e, Apocarotinal, Beta-Apocarotinal, 8'-Apo-β-caroten-8'-al, Beta-apo-8'-Carotinal (C30)
el: E160e, Β-απο-8′-καροτεναλη (c30)
es: E160e, Beta-apo-8′-carotenal (c30), Apocarotenal, Beta-apo-8'-carotenal, E 160e
et: E160e, Beeta-apo-8′-karotenaal (c30)
fi: E160e, Beta-apo-8′-karotenaali (c30), beta-apo-8 -karotenaali (C30)
fr: E160e, Apocaroténal 8', bêta-apocaroténal-8, bêta-apocaroténal-8' (C 30), β-apocaroténal-8’, CI food orange 6, C 30, C30, bêta-apocaroténal-8', colorant alimentaire orange CI 6, Β-apo-8′-caroténal (c30), bêta-apocaroténal, Apocaroténal, 1107-26-2, C30H40O
hr: E160e, beta-apo-8'-carotenal, beta-apo-8'-karotenal, beta-apo-8-carotenal, C30, C 30
hu: E160e, Béta-apo-8′-karotinal (c30)
it: E160e, Beta-apo-8′-carotenale (c30)
lt: E160e, Beta-apo-8′-karotenalis (c30), Beta apo-8'-karotenalis
lv: E160e, Βeta-apo-8′-karotenāls (c30)
mt: E160e, Beta-apo-8′-karotenal (c30)
nl: E160e, Beta-apo-8'-carotenal (c30), Apocarotenal
pl: E160e, Beta-apo-8′-karotenal (c30), β-apo-8′-karotenal, beta-apo-8-karotenal
pt: E160e, Beta-apo-8′-carotenal (c30)
ro: E160e, Beta-apo-8′-carotenal (c30)
sk: E160e, Beta-apo-8′-karotenal (c 30)
sl: E160e, Beta-apo-8'-karotenal (c30)
sv: E160e, Beta-apo-8′-karotenal (c 30), Beta-apo-8'-karotenal, E 160e

en: E160f, Ethyl ester of beta-apo-8'-carotenic acid (C 30), Ethyl ester of beta-apo-8'-carotenic acid , Food orange 7
xx: E160f
bg: E160f, Етилов естер на бета-апо-8'-каротенова киселина (C 30), Етилов естер на бета-апо-8'-каротенова киселина
de: E160f, β-Apo-8′-carotinsäureethylester, E 160f, Beta-apo-8’-Carotinsäure (C30) Ethylester, Beta-Carotinsäureester, Apocarotinester, Ethyl-8'-apo-β-caroten-8'-oat, Ethyl-8′-apo-β-caroten-8′-oat
es: E160f, Éster etílico del ácido beta-apo-8'-carotenoico (C 30), Éster etílico del ácido beta-apo-8'-carotenoico
fi: E160f, Beta-apo-8’-karoteenihapon etyyliesteri
fr: E160f, Ester éthylique de l'acide -apocaroténique-8', Ester éthylique de l'acide apocaroténique-8'
hu: E160f, Béta-apo-8'-karoténsav-etil észter
it: E160f, Estere etilico dell'acido beta-apo-8'-carotenico (C 30), Estere etilico dell'acido beta-apo-8'-carotenico
ja: E160f, ベータ-アポ-8'-カロテン酸エチルエステル (C 30), ベータ-アポ-8'-カロテン酸エチルエステル
ko: E160f, 베타-아포-8'-카로틴산 에틸 에스테르 (C 30), 베타-아포-8'-카로틴산 에틸 에스테르
nl: E160f, Beta-8'-caroteenzure ethylester
pl: E160f, β-apo-8′-karotenian etylu, ester etylowy kwasu β-apo-8′-karotenowego
pt: E160f, Éster etílico do ácido beta-apo-8'-carotênico (C 30), Éster etílico do ácido beta-apo-8'-carotênico
ro: E160f, Beta-apo-carotenic, Acid metil, Etil ester
ru: E160f, Этиловый эфир бета-апо-8'-каротиновой кислоты (C 30), Этиловый эфир бета-апо-8'-каротиновой кислоты
sv: E160f, Beta-apo-8'-karotensyraetylester
zh: E160f, β-阿朴-8'-胡萝卜酸乙酯 (C 30), β-阿朴-8'-胡萝卜酸乙酯

en: E161, Xanthophylls
xx: E161
bg: E161, Ксантофили
ca: E161, Xantofil, Xantòfils
cs: E161, Xantofyly
da: E161, Xanthophyller
de: E161, Xanthophylle
el: E161, Ξανθοφύλλες
es: E161, Xantofilos
et: E161, Ksantofüllid
fi: E161, Ksantofyllit, Ksantofyllejä
fr: E161, Xanthophylles
hu: E161, Xantofillek, Xantofillok
it: E161, Xantofille
lt: E161, Ksantofilai
lv: E161, Ksantofili
mt: E161, Xantofilli
nl: E161, Xanthofylen
pl: E161, Ksantofile
pt: E161, Xantofilos
ro: E161, Xantofile
sk: E161, Xantofyly
sl: E161, Ksantofili
sv: E161, Xantofyller

en: E161a, Flavoxanthin
xx: E161a
bg: E161a, Флавоксантин
cs: E161a, Flavoxanthin
da: E161a, Flavoxanthin
de: E161a, Flavoxanthin
el: E161a, Φλαβοξανθίνη
es: E161a, Flavoxantina
et: E161a, Flavoksantiin
fi: E161a, Flavoksantiini, Flavoksantiinia
fr: E161a, Flavoxanthine, flavoxanthin
hu: E161a, Flavoxantin
it: E161a, Flavoxantina
lt: E161a, Flavoksantinas
lv: E161a, Flavoksantīns
mt: E161a, Flavoxanthin
nl: E161a, Flavoxanthine
pl: E161a, Flawoksantyna
pt: E161a, Flavoxantina
ro: E161a, Flavoxantină
sk: E161a, Flavoxanthin
sl: E161a, Flavoksantin
sv: E161a, Flavoxantin

en: E161b, Lutein, Mixed Carotenoids, Xanthophyll, tagete extract
xx: E161b
ar: E161b, لوتين
bg: E161b, Лутеин, Смесени каротиноиди
ca: E161b, luteïna, luteina
cs: E161b, Lutein, Směs karotenoidů
da: E161b, Lutein, Blandede carotenoider
de: E161b, Lutein, Gemischte Carotinoide
el: E161b, Λουτεϊνη, Μείγματα καροτενοειδών
eo: E161b, luteino
es: E161b, Luteína, Mezcla de carotenoides
et: E161b, Luteiin, Karotenoidide segu
eu: E161b, Luteina
fa: E161b, لوتئین
fi: E161b, Luteoliini, luteiini, Luteoliinia, luteiinia
fr: E161b, Lutéine, Lutéines, Lutéines de Tagetes erecta, Extrais de tagetes, xantophylles, Extrait de tagetes, Extraits de tagetes, Lutéol de légumes, extrait de tagète
gl: E161b, Luteína
he: E161b, לוטאין
hr: E161b, lutein
hu: E161b, Lutein, Vegyes karotinoidok
it: E161b, Luteina, Carotenoidi misti
ja: E161b, ルテイン
ko: E161b, 루테인
lt: E161b, Liuteinas, Karotenoidų mišinys
lv: E161b, Luteīns, Jauktie karotinoīdi
mk: E161b, Лутеин
mt: E161b, Luteina, Karotenojdi mħallta
nb: E161b, Lutein
nl: E161b, Luteïne, Gemengde carotenoïden, extract van afrikaantje
nn: E161b, lutein
pl: E161b, Luteina, Mieszanina karotenoidów
pt: E161b, Luteína, Mistura de carotenóides
ro: E161b, Luteină, Amestec de carotenoide, lutetina
ru: E161b, лютеин
sh: E161b, Lutein
sk: E161b, Luteín, Zmes karotenoidov
sl: E161b, Lutein, mešani karotenoidi
sr: E161b, лутеин
sv: E161b, Lutein, Blandade karotenoider
tr: Lutein
uk: E161b, Лютеїн
vi: E161b, lutein
zh: E161b, 葉黃素

en: E161b(i), Lutein from Tagetes erecta
xx: E161b(i)

en: E161b(ii)
xx: E161b(ii)

en: E161b(iii), Lutein esters from Tagetes erecta
xx: E161b(iii)

en: E161c, Cryptoaxanthin, Cryptoxanthin
xx: E161c
ar: E161c, كريبتوزانتين
bg: E161c, Криптоксантин
ca: E161c, Criptoxantina
cs: E161c, Kryptoxantin
da: E161c, Kryptoxanthin
de: E161c, Cryptoxanthin
el: E161c, Κρυπτοξανθίνη
es: E161c, Criptoxantina, E 161c, Β-Criptoxantina
et: E161c, E161c food additive
fi: E161c, Kryptoksantiini, Kryptoksantiinia
fr: E161c, Cryptoxanthine, Kryptoxanthine, β-carotène-3-ol, β-cryptoxanthine, Cryptoxanthol, Hydroxy-β-carotène, beta-carotène-3-ol, beta-cryptoxanthine, Cryptoxanthol, Hydroxy-beta-carotène
he: E161c, קריפטוקסנטין
hu: E161c, Kriptoxantin
it: E161c, Criptoxantina
ja: E161c, クリプトキサンチン
ko: E161c, 크립토잔틴
lt: E161c, Kriptoksantinas
nl: E161c, Kryptoxanthine
pl: E161c, Kryptoksantyna
pt: E161c, Criptoxantina
ro: E161c, Kryptoxantină
ru: E161c, Криптоксантин
sk: E161c, Kryptoxantín
sl: E161c, Kriptoksantin
sv: E161c, Kryptoxantin
tr: E161c, Kriptoksantin
zh: E161c, 隐黄质

en: E161d, Rubixanthin
xx: E161d
bg: E161d, Рубиксантин
cs: E161d, Rubixantin
da: E161d, Rubixantin
de: E161d, Rubixanthin
el: E161d, Ρουμπιξανθίνη
es: E161d, Rubixantina
et: E161d, Rubikantin
fi: E161d, Rubiksantiini, Rubiksantiinia, Natural yellow 27, C.I. 75135, CI 75135
fr: E161d, Rubixanthine, Natural yellow 27, C.I. 75135, CI 75135
hu: E161d, Rubixantin
it: E161d, Rubixantina
lt: E161d, Rubiksantinas
lv: E161d, Rubiksantīns
mt: E161d, Rubixantin
nl: E161d, Rubixanthine
pl: E161d, Rubiksantyna, Rubiksanit
pt: E161d, Rubixantina
ro: E161d, Rubixantină
sk: E161d, Rubixantín
sl: E161d, Rubixantin
sv: E161d, Rubixantin

en: E161e, Violaxanthin
xx: E161e
ar: E161e, فيولاكسانثين
bg: E161e, Виолаксантин
ca: E161e, Violaxantina
cs: E161e, Violaxanthin
da: E161e, Violaxanthin
de: E161e, Violaxanthin
el: E161e, Βιολαξανθίνη
es: E161e, Violaxantina
et: E161e, Violaksantiin
fi: E161e, Violaksantiini, Violoksantiini, Violaksantiinia, Violoksantiinia
fr: E161e, Violaxanthine, Violoxanthine, Diépoxyde de zéaxanthine
hu: E161e, Violaxantin
it: E161e, Violaxantina
ja: E161e, ビオラキサンチン
ko: E161e, 비올라잔틴
lt: E161e, Violaksantinas
lv: E161e, Violaksantīns
nl: E161e, Violoxanthine, Violaxanthine
pl: E161e, Wiolaksantyna
pt: E161e, Violaxantina
ro: E161e, Violoxantină
ru: E161e, Виолаксантин
sk: E161e, Violaxanthin
sl: E161e, Violaxanthin
sv: E161e, Violaxantin
zh: E161e, 紫黄质

en: E161f, Rhodoxanthin
xx: E161f
ar: E161f, رودوكسانثين
bg: E161f, Родоксантин
ca: E161f, Rodoxantina
cs: E161f, Rhodoxanthin
da: E161f, Rhodoxanthin
de: E161f, Rhodoxanthin
el: E161f, Ροδοξανθίνη
es: E161f, Rodoxantina
et: E161f, Rodoksantiin
fi: E161f, Rodoksantiini, Rodoksantiinia
fr: E161f, Rhodoxanthine
hu: E161f, Rhodoxantin
it: E161f, Rodoxantina
ja: E161f, ロドキサンチン
ko: E161f, 로독산틴
lt: E161f, Rodoksantinas
lv: E161f, Rodoksantīns
nl: E161f, Rhodoxanthine
pl: E161f, Rodoksantyna
pt: E161f, Rodoxantina
ro: E161f, Rodoxantină
ru: E161f, Родоксантин
sk: E161f, Rodoxantín
sl: E161f, Rodoksantin
sv: E161f, Rodoxantin
th: E161f, โรดอกแซนทีน
tr: E161f, Rodoksantin
uk: E161f, Родоксантин
zh: E161f, 红黄素

en: E161g, Canthaxanthin
xx: E161g
bg: E161g, Кантаксантин
cs: E161g, Kanthaxanthin, Kantaxantin
da: E161g, Canthaxanthin
de: E161g, Canthaxanthin
el: E161g, Κανθαξανθινη
es: E161g, Cantaxantina
et: E161g, Kantaksantiin
fi: E161g, Kantaksantiini, Kantaksantiinia, CI 40850
fr: E161g, Canthaxanthine, Colorant alimentaire orange C.I. no.8, C.I. Food Orange 8, C.I. 40850, CI 40850
hu: E161g, Kantaxantin
it: E161g, Cantaxantina
lt: E161g, Kantaksantinas
lv: E161g, Kantaksantīns
mt: E161g, Kantaksantina
nl: E161g, Canthaxanthine, Canthaxantine
pl: E161g, Kantaksantyna
pt: E161g, Cantaxantina
ro: E161g, Cantaxantină
sk: E161g, Kantaxantín
sl: E161g, Kantaksantin
sv: E161g, Kantaxantin